test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-bivval_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - bivval: # 

    bivval+A+Attr: bivvalis

    bivval+A+Sg+Nom: bivval
    bivval+A+Pl+Nom: bivvala

#    bivval+A+Sg+Gen: bivvala
#    bivval+A+Sg+Acc: bivvalav
#    bivval+A+Sg+Ill: bivvalij
#    bivval+A+Sg+Ine: bivvalin
#    bivval+A+Sg+Ela: [bivvalist, bivvalis]
#    bivval+A+Sg+Com: bivvalijn
#    bivval+A+Pl+Gen: bivvalij
#    bivval+A+Pl+Acc: bivvalijd
#    bivval+A+Pl+Ill: bivvalijda
#    bivval+A+Pl+Ine: bivvalijn
#    bivval+A+Pl+Ela: [bivvalijst, bivvalijs]
#    bivval+A+Pl+Com: [bivvalij, bivvalijgum]
##    bivval+A+Ess: bivvalin


    bivval+A+Comp+Attr: bivvalup

    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: bivvalup
    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [bivvalubo, bivvaluba]

#    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: bivvalubo
#    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: bivvalubov
#    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: bivvaluboj
#    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: bivvalubon
#    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [bivvalubost, bivvalubos]
#    bivval+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [bivvalubojn, bivvalubojna]
#    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: bivvaluboj
#    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: bivvalubojd
#    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: bivvalubojda
#    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: bivvalubojn
#    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [bivvalubojst, bivvalubojs]
#    bivval+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [bivvaluboj, bivvalubojgum]
##    bivval+A+Comp+Ess: bivvalubon


    bivval+A+Superl+Attr: bivvalumos

    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bivvalumos
    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: bivvalubmusa

#    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: bivvalubmusa
#    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: bivvalubmusav
#    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: bivvalubmusij
#    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: bivvalubmusin
#    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [bivvalubmusist, bivvalubmusis]
#    bivval+A+Superl+Sg+Com: bivvalubmusijn
#    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: bivvalubmusij
#    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: bivvalubmusijd
#    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: bivvalubmusijda
#    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: bivvalubmusijn
#    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [bivvalubmusijst, bivvalubmusijs]
#    bivval+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [bivvalubmusij, bivvalubmusijgum]
##    bivval+A+Superl+Ess: bivvalubmuson
